en: Scoops
xx: Scoops
cs: Velké lžíce
da: Opøserskeer
de: Portionierer
es: Cucharas para bolas
fr: Pelles
it: Cucchiai da servizio
ja: スクープ
nl: Opscheplepels
no: Dessertskjeer
pl: Łyżki do nabierania
pt: Conchas
ru: Разливные ложки
sv: Skopor
tr: Kepçeler

en: Ice Cream Scoops
xx: Ice Cream Scoops
cs: Lžíce na zmrzlinu
da: Iskugleskeer
de: Eiscremeportionierer
es: Cucharas de helados
fr: Cuillères à glace
it: Palette per gelato
ja: アイスクリームスクープ
nl: IJsscheppen
no: Iskremskjeer
pl: Łyżki do lodów
pt: Conchas de sorvete
ru: Ложки для мороженого
sv: Glasskopor
tr: Dondurma Kepçeleri

en: Ice Scoops
xx: Ice Scoops
cs: Lopatky na led
da: Isskeer
de: Eisportionierer
es: Palas para hielo
fr: Cuillères à glaçons
it: Palette ghiaccio
ja: アイススコップ
nl: IJslepels
no: Isskuffer
pl: Szufelki do lodu
pt: Pazinhas para gelo
ru: Лопатки для льда
sv: Isskopor
tr: Buz Kürekleri

en: Melon Ballers
xx: Melon Ballers
cs: Vykrajovače na meloun
da: Melonkugleskeer
de: Kugelausstecher
es: Cucharas cortamelón
fr: Cuillères parisiennes
it: Cucchiai per melone
ja: メロンボーラー
nl: Meloenlepels
no: Melonskjeer
pl: Łyżki do melonów
pt: Boleadores de melão
ru: Приспособления для нарезки шариков из дыни
sv: Melonskopor
tr: Kavun Kaşıkları

en: Popcorn & French Fry Scoops
xx: Popcorn & French Fry Scoops
cs: Lopatky na hranolky a popcorn
da: Skovle til popcorn og pommes frites
de: Popcorn- & Pommesschaufeln
es: Palas para palomitas y patatas fritas
fr: Pelles à frites et pop-corn
it: Schiumaiola per fritti e pop-corn
ja: ポップコーン・フライドポテト用スクープ
nl: Scheppen voor popcorn en friet
no: Serveringsskuffe til popcorn og pommes frites
pl: Łopatki do popcornu i frytek
pt: Pá para pipoca e batata frita
ru: Совки для попкорна и картофеля фри
sv: Skopor för popcorn och pommes frites
tr: Patlamış Mısır ve Patates Kızartması Kepçeleri

en: Sink Caddies
xx: Sink Caddies
cs: Odkládací nádobky ke dřezu
da: Opbevaring til vasken
de: Spülbeckenkörbe
es: Organizadores de fregadero
fr: Porte-éponges pour évier
it: Portaoggetti per lavandino
ja: シンクポケット
nl: Gootsteenbakjes
no: Oppvaskkum-beholdere
pl: Pojemniki do zlewozmywaków
pt: Porta-utensílios de pia
ru: Органайзеры для раковин
sv: Diskhokorgar
tr: Lavabo Kenarı Düzenleyicileri

en: Sink Mats & Grids
xx: Sink Mats & Grids
cs: Podložky do dřezu
da: Måtter og riste til vasken
de: Spülbeckenmatten
es: Esteras antideslizantes para fregaderos
fr: Tapis d'évier
it: Tappetini per lavello
ja: シンクマット
nl: Gootsteenmatten
no: Matter og rister til oppvaskkummer
pl: Maty i kratki do zlewu
pt: Tapetes para pia
ru: Коврики и решетки для раковин
sv: Mattor och galler till diskhoar
tr: Lavabo Paspasları ve Izgaraları

en: Slotted Spoons
xx: Slotted Spoons
cs: Odkapávací lžíce
da: Hulskeer
de: Schaumlöffel
es: Espumaderas
fr: Cuillère à rainures
it: Schiumarole
ja: 穴あきおたま
nl: Lepels met sleuven
no: Hulløser
pl: Łyżki durszlakowe
pt: Escumadeiras
ru: Шумовки
sv: Hålslevar
tr: Delikli Kaşıklar

en: Spatulas
xx: Spatulas
cs: Obracečky
da: Spatler
de: Pfannenwender
es: Espátulas de cocina
fr: Spatules
it: Spatole
ja: スパチュラ
nl: Spatels
no: Stekespader
pl: Płaskie łopatki
pt: Espátulas
ru: Кухонные лопатки
sv: Stekspadar
tr: Spatulalar

en: Spice Grinder Accessories
xx: Spice Grinder Accessories
cs: Mlýnky na koření – příslušenství
da: Krydderikværn – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Gewürzmühlen
es: Accesorios de molinillo para especias
fr: Accessoires pour moulins à épices
it: Accessori macina spezie
ja: スパイスミル関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor specerijmolens
no: Tilbehør til krydderkverner
pl: Akcesoria do młynków do przypraw
pt: Acessórios para moedor de temperos
ru: Принадлежности для мельниц для пряностей
sv: Tillbehör till kryddkvarnar
tr: Baharat Değirmeni Aksesuarları

en: Spice Grinders
xx: Spice Grinders
cs: Mlýnky na koření
da: Krydderikværne
de: Gewürzmühlen
es: Molinillos para especias
fr: Moulins à épices
it: Macina spezie
ja: スパイスミル
nl: Specerijmolens
no: Krydderkverner
pl: Młynki do przypraw
pt: Moedor de temperos
ru: Мельницы для пряностей
sv: Kryddkvarnar
tr: Baharat Değirmenleri

en: Spoon Rests
xx: Spoon Rests
cs: Stojánky na vařečku
da: Skeholdere
de: Löffelablagen
es: Reposacucharas
fr: Porte-cuillères
it: Portacucchiai
ja: お玉立て
nl: Lepelleggers
no: Øseholdere
pl: Podpórki na łyżki
pt: Descansos para colheres
ru: Подставки для ложек
sv: Skedhållare
tr: Kaşık Altlıkları

en: Sugar Dispensers
xx: Sugar Dispensers
cs: Dávkovače na cukr
da: Sukkerskåle
de: Zuckerspender
es: Azucareros
fr: Sucriers
it: Dispensatori di zucchero
ja: 砂糖入れ
nl: Suikerdispensers
no: Sukkerdispensere
pl: Dozowniki cukru
pt: Açucareiros
ru: Диспенсеры сахара
sv: Sockerströare
tr: Şeker Dispenserleri

en: Sushi Mats
xx: Sushi Mats
cs: Podložky na suši
da: Sushimåtter
de: Sushi-Matten
es: Esterillas para sushi
fr: Nattes à sushis
it: Stuoie per sushi
ja: 巻き簾
nl: Sushimatjes
no: Rullematter til sushi
pl: Maty do sushi
pt: Esteiras para sushi
ru: Коврики для суши
sv: Sushimattor
tr: Suşi Matları

en: Tea Strainers
xx: Tea Strainers
cs: Čajová sítka
da: Tesier
de: Teesiebe
es: Coladores de té
fr: Passoires à thé
it: Filtri per il tè
ja: 茶こし・ティーストレーナー
nl: Theezeefjes
no: Tesiler
pl: Zaparzacze do herbaty
pt: Coadores de chá
ru: Чайные ситечки
sv: Tefilter
tr: Çay Süzgeçleri

en: Tongs
xx: Tongs
cs: Kleště na vaření
da: Køkkentænger
de: Küchenzangen
es: Pinzas de cocina
fr: Pinces de cuisine
it: Pinze da cucina
ja: トング
nl: Tangen
no: Pølseklyper
pl: Szczypce kuchenne
pt: Pegadores
ru: Щипцы
sv: Kökstänger
tr: Maşalar

en: Whisks
xx: Whisks
cs: Šlehací metly
da: Piskeris
de: Schneebesen
es: Batidores de varillas
fr: Fouets
it: Fruste da cucina
ja: 泡立て器
nl: Gardes
no: Visper
pl: Trzepaczki
pt: Batedores de ovos
ru: Венчики
sv: Vispar
tr: Çırpma Aletleri

en: Prefabricated Kitchens & Kitchenettes
xx: Prefabricated Kitchens & Kitchenettes
cs: Kuchyně včetně spotřebičů
da: Elementkøkkener
de: Küchenblöcke & Pantryküchen
es: Cocinas y zonas de cocina prefabricadas
fr: Cuisines et kitchenettes équipées
it: Cucine e cucinotti prefabbricati
ja: システムキッチン
nl: Prefabkeukens en -kitchenettes
no: Monteringsferdige kjøkken og kjøkkenkroker
pl: Gotowe kuchnie i aneksy kuchenne
pt: Cozinhas e quitinetes pré-fabricadas
ru: Сборные кухни и мини-кухни
sv: Monteringsfärdiga kök och pentryn
tr: Prefabrike Mutfaklar

en: Tableware
xx: Tableware
cs: Stolní nádobí
da: Service og bestik
de: Tafelgeschirr
es: Utensilios de mesa
fr: Arts de la table
it: Stoviglie
ja: テーブルウェア
nl: Servies en bestek
no: Servise og bestikk
pl: Zastawy stołowe
pt: Utensílios para mesa
ru: Столовая посуда
sv: Serviser
tr: Sofra Takımları

en: Coffee & Tea Sets
xx: Coffee & Tea Sets
cs: Kávové a čajové sety
da: Kaffe- og testel
de: Kaffee- & Teeservices
es: Juegos de café y té
fr: Services à thé ou à café
it: Set per caffè e tè
ja: コーヒーカップ・ティーカップセット
nl: Koffie- en theestellen
no: Kaffe- og tesett
pl: Komplety herbaciane i kawowe
pt: Conjuntos de café e chá
ru: Кофейные и чайные наборы
sv: Kaffe- och teserviser
tr: Kahve ve Çay Takımları